Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2610
Manufacturer, defined.

Manufacturer means a person who manufactures or assembles assistive devices and agents of that person, including an importer, a distributor, a factory branch, a distributor branch, and any warrantors of the manufacturer's assistive device, but not including an assistive device dealer.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 10.